test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_A_NoExtra_nika_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: onikaimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: onikaimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: onikaimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: onikaimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: onikaimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: onikaimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: onikaimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: onikaimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: onikaimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: onikaimishiniibanan
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: onikaimishiniibanag
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: onikaimishiniibaning
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: onikaimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: onikaimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: onikaimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nikaensimishinaanibanan
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nikaensimishinaanibanag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nikaensimishinaanibaning
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nikaensimishiwaaibanan
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nikaensimishiwaaibanag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nikaensimishiwaaibaning
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nikaensimishiniibanan
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nikaensimishiniibanag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nikaensimishiniibaning
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nikaensimishini***idig, idog***an
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nikaensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nikaensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nikaenhimishinaanibanan
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nikaenhimishinaanibanag
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nikaenhimishinaanibaning
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nikaenhimishiwaaibanan
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nikaenhimishiwaaibanag
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nikaenhimishiwaaibaning
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nikaenhimishiniibanan
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nikaenhimishiniibanag
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nikaenhimishiniibaning
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nikaenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninikaensimishinaanibanan
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninikaensimishinaanibanag
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninikaensimishinaanibaning
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ninikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ninikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ninikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ninikaensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ninikaensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ninikaensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ninikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ninikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ninikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ninikaensimishiniibanan
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ninikaensimishiniibanag
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ninikaensimishiniibaning
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ninikaensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ninikaensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ninikaensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ninikaenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ninikaenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ninikaenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ninikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ninikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ninikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ninikaenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ninikaenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ninikaenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ninikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ninikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ninikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ninikaenhimishiniibanan
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ninikaenhimishiniibanag
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ninikaenhimishiniibaning
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ninikaenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ninikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ninikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ginikaensimishinaanibanan
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ginikaensimishinaanibanag
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ginikaensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ginikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ginikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ginikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ginikaensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ginikaensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ginikaensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ginikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ginikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ginikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ginikaensimishiniibanan
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ginikaensimishiniibanag
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ginikaensimishiniibaning
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ginikaensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ginikaensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ginikaensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ginikaenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ginikaenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ginikaenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ginikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ginikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ginikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ginikaenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ginikaenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ginikaenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ginikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ginikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ginikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ginikaenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ginikaenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ginikaenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ginikaenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ginikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ginikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: onikaensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: onikaensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: onikaensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: onikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: onikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: onikaensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: onikaensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: onikaensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: onikaensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: onikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: onikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: onikaensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: onikaensimishiniibanan
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: onikaensimishiniibanag
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: onikaensimishiniibaning
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: onikaensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: onikaensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: onikaensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: onikaenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: onikaenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: onikaenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: onikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: onikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: onikaenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: onikaenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: onikaenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: onikaenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: onikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: onikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: onikaenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: onikaenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: onikaenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: onikaenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: onikaenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: onikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: onikaenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
